Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB720.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 9 of this Act:
(1) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic,
wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;
(2) "Electronic presence" means the relationship of two (2) or more individuals in
different locations communicating in real time to the same extent as if the
individuals were physically present in the same location;
(3) "Electronic will" means a will executed electronically in compliance with the
requirements of Section 4 of this Act;
(4) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is
stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;
(5) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(b) To affix to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol or
process;
(6) "State" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act; and
(7) "Will" has the same meaning as in Section 88 of this Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
An electronic will is a will for all purposes of the law of this Commonwealth. The law
of this Commonwealth applicable to wills and principles of equity apply to an
electronic will, except as modified by Sections 1 to 9 of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
A will executed electronically but not in compliance with Section 4 of this Act is an
electronic will if executed in compliance with the law of the jurisdiction where the
testator is:
(1) Physically located when the will is signed; or
(2) Domiciled or residing when the will is signed or when the testator dies.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (3) of Section 6 of this Act, an electronic will shall be:
(a) A record that is readable as text at the time of signing under paragraph (b)
of this subsection;
(b) Signed by:
1. The testator; or
2. Another individual in the testator's name, in the testator's physical
presence, and by the testator's direction; and
(c) Signed in the physical or electronic presence of the testator by at least two
(2) individuals, each of whom is a resident of this Commonwealth and
physically located in this Commonwealth at the time of signing and within a
reasonable time after witnessing:
1. The signing of the will under paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
2. The testator's acknowledgement of the signing of the will under
paragraph (b) of this subsection or acknowledgement of the will.
(2) An electronic symbol of a testator or witness shall consist of an electronic image
of the testator's or witness's signature in his or her handwriting affixed to the
electronic will.
(3) A testator's intent that the record under subsection (1)(a) of this section be the
testator's electronic will may be established by extrinsic evidence.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
Page 2 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An electronic will may revoke all or part of a previous will.
(2) All or part of an electronic will may be revoked by:
(a) A subsequent will that revokes all or part of the electronic will expressly or
by inconsistency; or
(b) A physical act, if it is established by clear and convincing evidence that the
testator, with the intent of revoking all or part of the will, performed the act
or directed another individual who performed the act in the testator's
physical presence.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An electronic will may be simultaneously executed, attested, and made self-
proving by acknowledgement of the testator and affidavits of witnesses.
(2) The acknowledgement and affidavits under subsection (1) of this section shall be:
(a) Made before a notary public authorized to administer oaths under the law
of the state in which execution occurs or, if fewer than two (2) attesting
witnesses are physically present in the same location as the testator at the
time of signing under subsection (1)(b) of Section 4 of this Act, before a
notary public authorized under KRS 423.455;
(b) Evidenced by the notary public's certificate under official seal affixed to or
logically associated with the electronic will; and
(c) In a form substantially similar to subsections (1) and (2) of KRS 394.225.
(3) A signature physically or electronically affixed to an affidavit that is affixed to or
logically associated with an electronic will under Sections 1 to 9 of this Act is
deemed a signature of the electronic will under subsection (1) of Section 4 of this
Act.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
Page 3 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
READ AS FOLLOWS:
An individual may create a certified paper copy of an electronic will by affirming under
penalty of perjury that a paper copy of the electronic will is a complete, true, and
accurate copy of the electronic will. If the electronic will is made self-proving, the
certified paper copy of the will shall include the self-proving affidavits.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 1 to 9 of this Act, consideration shall be given to
the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among
states that enact it.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 to 9 of this Act shall apply to the will of a decedent who dies on or after the
effective date of this Act.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 10 to 24 of this Act:
(1) "Electronic" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(2) "Electronic record" means a record created, generated, sent, communicated,
received, or stored by electronic means;
(3) "Electronic signature" means an electronic symbol or process attached to or
logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the
intent to sign the record;
(4) "Information" includes data, text, images, codes, computer programs, software,
and databases;
(5) "Nontestamentary estate planning document" means a record relating to estate
planning that is readable as text at the time of signing and is not a will or
Page 4 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
contained in a will. The term:
(a) Includes a record readable as text at the time of signing that creates,
exercises, modifies, releases, or revokes:
1. A trust instrument;
2. A trust power that under the terms of the trust requires a signed
record;
3. A certification of a trust under KRS 386B.10-120;
4. A power of attorney that is durable under KRS Chapter 457;
5. An agent's certification under KRS 457.430;
6. A power of appointment;
7. An advance directive or medical order for scope of treatment under
KRS 311.621 to 311.643;
8. A record directing disposition of an individual's body after death;
9. A nomination of a guardian for the signing individual;
10. A nomination of a guardian for a minor child or disabled adult child;
11. An advance directive for mental health treatment under KRS
202A.420 to 202A.432;
12. A community property survivorship agreement;
13. A disclaimer under KRS 394.035 or KRS 394.610 to 394.670; and
14. Any other record intended to carry out an individual's intent
regarding property or health care while incapacitated or on death; and
(b) Does not include a deed of real property or certificate of title for a motor
vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft;
(6) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(7) "Power of attorney" means a record that grants authority to an agent in place of
the principal, even if the term is not used in the record;
(8) "Record" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
Page 5 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(9) "Security procedure" means a procedure to verify that an electronic signature,
record, or performance is that of a specific person or to detect a change or error
in an electronic record. The term includes a procedure that uses an algorithm,
code, identifying word or number, encryption, or callback or other
acknowledgement procedure;
(10) "Settlor" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(11) "Sign" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(12) "State" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(13) "Terms of a trust" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(14) "Trust instrument" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act; and
(15) "Will" has the same meaning as in Section 88 of this Act.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 10 to 24 of this Act shall be construed and applied to:
(1) Facilitate electronic estate planning documents and signatures consistent with
other law; and
(2) To be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic documents and
signatures and continued expansion of those practices.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, Sections 10 to 24 of this Act
apply to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document and an
electronic signature on a nontestamentary estate planning document.
(2) Sections 10 to 24 of this Act do not apply to a nontestamentary estate planning
document if the document precludes use of an electronic record or electronic
signature.
(3) Sections 10 to 24 of this Act do not affect the validity of an electronic record or
Page 6 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
electronic signature that is valid under:
(a) The Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, KRS 369.101 to 369.120; or
(b) The Uniform Electronic Wills Act, Sections 1 to 9 of this Act.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The law of this Commonwealth and principles of equity applicable to a
nontestamentary estate planning document apply to an electronic nontestamentary
estate planning document except as modified by Sections 10 to 24 of this Act.
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Sections 10 to 24 of this Act do not require a nontestamentary estate planning
document or signature on a nontestamentary estate planning document to be
created, generated, sent, communicated, received, stored, or otherwise processed
or used by electronic means or in electronic form.
(2) A person is not required to have a nontestamentary estate planning document in
electronic form or signed electronically even if the person previously created or
signed a nontestamentary estate planning document by electronic means.
(3) A person may not waive the provisions of this section.
SECTION 15. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A nontestamentary estate planning document or signature on a nontestamentary
estate planning document shall not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely
because it is in electronic form.
(2) If any other law of this Commonwealth requires a signature on a
nontestamentary estate planning document to be in writing, an electronic record
of the document satisfies the requirement.
(3) If other law of this Commonwealth requires a signature on a nontestamentary
Page 7 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
estate planning document, an electronic signature satisfies the requirement.
SECTION 16. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An electronic nontestamentary estate planning document or electronic signature
on an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document is attributable to a
person if it was the act of the person. The act of the person may be shown in any
manner, including by showing the efficacy of a security procedure applied to
determine the person to which the electronic record or electronic signature was
attributable.
(2) The effect of attribution to a person under subsection (1) of this section of a
document or signature is determined from the context and surrounding
circumstances at the time of its creation, execution, or adoption and as provided
by other law.
SECTION 17. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
If other law of this Commonwealth requires a signature or record to be notarized,
acknowledged, verified, or made under oath, the requirement is satisfied with respect to
an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document if an individual authorized to
perform the notarization, acknowledgment, verification, or oath attaches or logically
associates the individual's electronic signature on the document together with all other
information required to be included under the other law.
SECTION 18. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If any other law of this Commonwealth bases the validity of a nontestamentary
estate planning document on whether it is signed, witnessed, or attested by
another individual, the signature, witnessing, or attestation of that individual may
be electronic.
Page 8 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(2) If other law of this Commonwealth bases the validity of a nontestamentary estate
planning document on whether it is signed, witnessed, or attested by another
individual in the presence of the individual signing the document, the presence
requirement is satisfied if the individuals are in each other's electronic presence.
SECTION 19. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if other law of this
Commonwealth requires an electronic nontestamentary estate planning
document to be retained, transmitted, copied, or filed, the requirement is satisfied
by retaining, transmitting, copying, or filing an electronic record that:
(a) Accurately reflects the information in the document after it was first
generated in final form as an electronic record or under Section 20 of this
Act; and
(b) Remains accessible to the extent required by the other law.
(2) A requirement under subsection (1) of this section to retain a record does not
apply to information the sole purpose of which is to enable the record to be sent,
communicated, or received.
(3) A person may satisfy subsection (1) of this section by using the services of
another person.
(4) If other law of this Commonwealth requires a nontestamentary estate planning
document to be presented or retained in its original form, or provides
consequences if a nontestamentary estate planning document is not presented or
retained in its original form, an electronic record retained in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section satisfies the other law.
(5) This section does not preclude a governmental agency from specifying
requirements for the retention of a record subject to the agency's jurisdiction in
addition to those in this section. In this subsection, "governmental agency"
Page 9 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
means an executive, legislative, or judicial agency, department, board,
commission, authority, institution, or instrumentality of the federal government
or of a state or of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of a state.
SECTION 20. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
An individual may create a certified paper copy of an electronic nontestamentary estate
planning document by affirming under penalty of perjury that the paper copy is a
complete and accurate copy of the document.
SECTION 21. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Evidence relating to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document or an
electronic signature on the document may not be excluded in a proceeding solely
because it is in electronic form.
SECTION 22. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 10 to 24 of this Act, a court shall consider the
promotion of uniformity of the law among the jurisdictions that enact it.
SECTION 23. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 10 to 24 of this Act modify, limit, or supersede the Electronic Signatures in
Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., as amended, but do
not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery
of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003(b).
SECTION 24. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 10 to 24 of this Act apply to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning
document created, signed, generated, sent, received, or stored before, on, or after the
Page 10 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
effective date of this Act.
SECTION 25. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 25 to 35 of this Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Claim" means a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to
judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured,
disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured, or unsecured;
(2) "Creditor" means, with respect to a transferor, a person who has a claim;
(3) "Debt" means liability on a claim;
(4) "Disposition":
(a) Means a transfer, conveyance, or assignment of property, including a
change in the legal ownership of property occurring upon the substitution
of one (1) trustee for another or the addition of one (1) or more new
trustees; and
(b) Includes the exercise of a power so as to cause a transfer of property to a
trustee or trustees, but shall not include the release or relinquishment of an
interest in property that, until the release or relinquishment, was the subject
of a qualified disposition;
(5) "Investment advisor" means a person given authority by the terms of a qualified
trust to direct, consent to, or disapprove a transferor's actual or proposed
investment decisions, distribution decisions, or other decisions of the transferor;
(6) "Investment decision" means the retention, purchase, sale, exchange, tender, or
other transaction affecting the ownership of or rights in investments;
(7) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(8) "Property" means anything that may be the subject of ownership, including real
property, personal property, and interests in real or personal property;
(9) "Qualified affidavit" means a sworn affidavit signed by the transferor before a
Page 11 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
disposition of assets to a qualified trust that meets the requirements of Section 26
of this Act. In the event of a disposition by a transferor who is a trustee, the
affidavit shall be signed by the transferor who made the original disposition to the
trustee or a predecessor trustee in a form that meets the requirements of
paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection and shall state facts as of the time of the
original disposition;
(10) "Qualified disposition" means a disposition by or from a transferor with or
without consideration to a qualified trust after the transferor executes a qualified
affidavit;
(11) "Qualified trust" means an instrument appointing a qualified trustee or qualified
trustees for property that is the subject of a disposition, which instrument:
(a) Expressly incorporates the law of this Commonwealth to govern the validity,
construction, and administration of the trust;
(b) Is irrevocable; and
(c) Provides that the interest of the transferor or other beneficiary in trust
property or income from trust property may not be transferred, assigned,
pledged, or mortgaged, whether voluntarily or involuntarily, before the
qualified trustee or qualified trustees actually distribute property or income
from the trust to the beneficiary;
(12) "Qualified trustee" means a person who:
(a) In the case of a natural person, is a resident of this Commonwealth, or in
all other cases, is authorized by the law of this Commonwealth to act as a
trustee and whose activities are subject to supervision by the Kentucky
Department of Financial Institutions, the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation, the Comptroller of the Currency, or any successor to those
entities;
(b) Maintains or arranges for custody in this Commonwealth of some or all of
Page 12 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition, maintains
records for the qualified trust on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis,
prepares or arranges for the preparation of required income tax returns for
the qualified trust, or otherwise materially participates in the administration
of the qualified trust; and
(c) Is not the transferor;
(13) "Spouse or former spouse" means only persons to whom the transferor was
legally married at or before the time the qualified disposition is made;
(14) "Transferor" means a person who, directly or indirectly, makes a disposition or
causes a disposition to be made in the person's capacity:
(a) As an owner of property;
(b) As a holder of a power of appointment that authorizes the holder to appoint
in favor of the holder, the holder's creditors, the holder's estate, or the
creditors of the holder's estate; or
(c) As a trustee; and
(15) "Trustee" means an original, additional, and successor trustee, and a cotrustee,
whether singular or plural, who is a fiduciary relative to any power or duty held
by that person that could otherwise be held by a trustee.
SECTION 26. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A qualified affidavit shall state that:
(1) The transferor has full right, title, and authority to transfer the assets to the trust;
(2) The transfer of the assets to the trust will not render the transferor insolvent;
(3) The transferor does not intend to defraud a creditor by transferring the assets to
the trust;
(4) The transferor does not have any pending or threatened court actions against the
transferor, except for those court actions identified by the transferor on an
Page 13 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
attachment to the affidavit;
(5) The transferor is not involved in any administrative proceedings, except for those
administrative proceedings identified on an attachment to the affidavit;
(6) The transferor does not contemplate filing for relief under the federal bankruptcy
code; and
(7) The assets being transferred to the trust were not derived from unlawful activities.
SECTION 27. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including KRS 386B.5-020(7)(a), no
action of any kind, including but not limited to an action to enforce a judgment
entered by a court or other body having adjudicative authority, shall be brought
at law or in equity for an attachment or other provisional remedy against property
that is the subject of a qualified disposition to a qualified trust or for the
avoidance of a qualified disposition to a qualified trust, unless:
(a) The action is brought pursuant to the Kentucky Uniform Voidable
Transactions Act, KRS 378A.005 to 378A.140; and
(b) The qualified disposition was made with actual intent to defraud a creditor
whose claim arose after a qualified disposition.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 378A.090, a creditor's claim under subsection (1) of
this section shall be extinguished:
1. If the person is a creditor when the qualified disposition to a qualified
trust is made, unless the action is commenced within the later of two
(2) years after the qualified disposition is made or six (6) months after
the person discovers or reasonably should have discovered the
qualified disposition; or
2. If the person becomes a creditor after a qualified disposition to a
qualified trust is made, unless the action is commenced within two (2)
Page 14 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
years after the qualified disposition is made; and
(b) If paragraph (a) of this subsection applies:
1. A person shall be deemed to have discovered the existence of a
qualified disposition to a qualified trust at the time any public record
is made of any transfer of property relative to the qualified disposition,
including but not limited to the conveyance of real property that is
recorded in the office of the county clerk in which the property is
located, the filing of a financing statement under Article 9 of KRS
Chapter 355, or the equivalent recording or filing of either with the
appropriate person or official under the laws of a jurisdiction other
than this Commonwealth; and
2. No creditor shall bring an action with respect to property that is the
subject of a qualified disposition unless that creditor proves by clear
and convincing evidence that the settlor's transfer of the property was
made with intent to defraud that specific creditor.
(3) For purposes of Sections 25 to 35 of this Act, a qualified disposition that is made
by means of a disposition by a transferor who is a trustee shall be deemed to have
been made as of the time the property that is the subject of the qualified
disposition was originally transferred to the transferor acting in the capacity of
trustee, or any predecessor trustee, in a form that meets the requirements of
subsections 11(a) and (c) of Section 25 of this Act.
(4) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary:
(a) A creditor, including a creditor whose claim arose before or after a
qualified disposition, or any other person shall have only the rights with
respect to a qualified disposition that are provided in this section and
Section 29 of this Act;
(b) Neither a creditor nor any other person shall have any claim or cause of
Page 15 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
action against the trustee, an advisor of a qualified trust, or any person
involved in the counseling, drafting, preparation, execution, or funding of a
qualified trust; and
(c) For purposes of this subsection, counseling, drafting, preparation,
execution, or funding of a qualified trust includes the counseling, drafting,
preparation, execution, or funding of a limited partnership or limited
liability company if interests in the limited partnership or limited liability
company are subsequently transferred to the qualified trust.
(5) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no action of any kind, including but not
limited to an action to enforce a judgment entered by a court or other body
having adjudicative authority, shall be brought at law or in equity against a
trustee or an advisor of a qualified trust, or against any person involved in the
counseling, drafting, preparation, execution, or funding of a qualified trust if, as
of the date the action is brought, an action by a creditor with respect to the
qualified trust would be barred under this section.
(6) In circumstances where more than one (1) qualified disposition is made by means
of the same qualified trust:
(a) The making of a subsequent qualified disposition shall be disregarded in
determining whether a creditor's claim with respect to a prior qualified
disposition is extinguished as provided in subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) Any distribution to a beneficiary shall be deemed to have been made from
the latest qualified disposition.
(7) (a) If, in any action brought against a qualified trust, a court takes any action
whereby the court declines to apply the law of this Commonwealth in
determining the effect of a spendthrift provision of the trust:
1. The trustee shall immediately, upon the court's action and without the
further order of any court, cease in all respects to be trustee and a
Page 16 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
successor trustee shall succeed as trustee in accordance with the terms
of the trust; or
2. If the trust does not provide for a successor trustee and the trust would
otherwise be without a trustee, a court of this Commonwealth, upon
the application of any beneficiary of the trust, shall appoint a
successor trustee upon the terms and conditions it determines to be
consistent with the purposes of the trust and Sections 25 to 35 of this
Act.
(b) Upon the trustee's ceasing to be trustee, the trustee shall have no power or
authority other than to convey the trust property to the successor trustee
named in the trust in accordance with this subsection.
(8) A qualified trust shall be subject to this section whether or not the transferor
retains any or all of the powers and rights described in Section 34 of this Act or
serves as an investment advisor pursuant to Section 32 of this Act.
(9) (a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the limitations on
actions by creditors in law or equity shall not apply, and such creditors'
claims shall not be extinguished, if the transferor is indebted on account of
an agreement, judgment, or order of a court for the payment of any of the
following:
1. Past due child support;
2. Past due temporary or permanent maintenance to a spouse or former
spouse; or
3. A written agreement, judgment, or order of a court for division of
marital property of a spouse or former spouse, but only to the extent of
the debt, legally mandated interest on the debt, and the reasonable cost
of collection of the debt.
(b) 1. A claim under this subsection shall be asserted against a trustee only:
Page 17 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
a. Upon a final, nonappealable determination of a Kentucky court
or a fully domesticated, final, nonappealable order of a court of
another state as defined by Section 82 of this Act that the debt is
past due; and
b. After the court has determined that the claimant has made
reasonable attempts to collect the debt from any other sources of
the transferor or that such attempts would be futile.
2. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit the court
from making the findings required in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph in the same proceeding and order.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to any claim for forced heirship, legitime, or
elective share.
SECTION 28. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A transferor shall only have the powers and rights conferred by the qualified trust. The
powers and rights conferred by the qualified trust upon the transferor are personal
powers and rights that may not be exercised by a creditor or any other person, except
as expressly permitted by the trust. Except as permitted by Sections 32 and 34 of this
Act, the transferor shall have no rights or authority with respect to the corpus of the
qualified trust or the income from the trust, and any agreement or understanding
purporting to grant or permit the retention of any greater rights or authority shall be
void.
SECTION 29. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A qualified disposition to a qualified trust shall be avoided only to the extent
necessary to satisfy the transferor's debt to the creditor at whose instance the
disposition was avoided, together with costs, including attorneys' fees, that the
Page 18 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
court may allow.
(2) In the event any qualified disposition is avoided as described in subsection (1) of
this section:
(a) If the court is satisfied that a qualified trustee has not acted in bad faith in
accepting or administering the property that is the subject of the qualified
disposition:
1. The qualified trustee shall have a first and paramount lien against the
property that is the subject of the qualified disposition in an amount
equal to the entire cost, including attorneys' fees, properly incurred by
the qualified trustee in defense of the action or proceedings to avoid
the qualified disposition;
2. The qualified disposition shall be avoided subject to the proper fees,
costs, preexisting rights, claims, and interests of the qualified trustee
and of any predecessor qualified trustee that has not acted in bad
faith; and
3. For purposes of this paragraph, it shall be presumed that the qualified
trustee did not act in bad faith merely by accepting the property; and
(b) 1. If the court is satisfied that a beneficiary of a qualified trust has not
acted in bad faith, the avoidance of the qualified disposition shall be
subject to the beneficiary's right to retain any distribution made upon
the exercise of a trust power or discretion vested in the qualified
trustee or qualified trustees of the qualified trust, which power or
discretion was properly exercised prior to the creditor's
commencement of an action to avoid a qualified disposition.
2. For purposes of this paragraph, it shall be presumed that the
beneficiary, including a beneficiary who is also a transferor of the
trust, did not act in bad faith merely by creating the trust or by
Page 19 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
accepting a distribution made in accordance with the terms of the
trust.
(3) A disposition by a trustee that is not a qualified trustee to a trustee that is a
qualified trustee shall not be treated as other than a qualified disposition solely
because the trust instrument fails to meet the requirements of subsection (11)(a)
of Section 25 of this Act.
(4) In the case of a disposition to more than one (1) trustee, a disposition that is
otherwise a qualified disposition shall not be treated as other than a qualified
disposition solely because not all of the recipient trustees are qualified trustees.
SECTION 30. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A spendthrift provision as described in subsection (11)(c) of Section 25 of this Act shall
be deemed to be a restriction on the transfer of the transferor's beneficial interest in
the trust that is enforceable under applicable nonbankruptcy law within the meaning
of 11 U.S.C. sec. 541(c)(2) or any successor provision.
SECTION 31. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of Sections 25 to 35 of this Act, none of the following shall be
considered a qualified trustee:
(a) The transferor or any other natural person who is a nonresident of this
Commonwealth; or
(b) An entity:
1. That is not authorized by the law of this Commonwealth to act as a
trustee; or
2. Whose activities are not subject to supervision as provided in
subsection (12)(a) of Section 25 of this Act.
(2) (a) Nothing in Sections 25 to 35 of this Act shall preclude a transferor from
Page 20 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
appointing one (1) or more advisors, including but not limited to:
1. Advisors who have authority under the terms of the trust instrument to
remove and appoint qualified trustees or trust advisors;
2. Advisors who have authority under the terms of the trust instrument to
direct, consent to, or disapprove distributions from the trust; or
3. Investment advisors, whether or not the advisors would meet the
requirements of subsection (12) of Section 25 of this Act.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "advisor" includes a trust protector or any
other person who, in addition to a qualified trustee, holds one (1) or more
trust powers.
SECTION 32. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A person may serve as an investment advisor notwithstanding that the person is the
transferor of the qualified disposition.
SECTION 33. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In the event that a qualified trustee of a qualified trust ceases to meet the requirements
of subsection (12)(a) of Section 25 of this Act, and there remains no trustee that meets
the requirements, the qualified trustee shall be deemed to have resigned as of the time
of that cessation, and thereupon, the successor qualified trustee provided for in the
qualified trust shall become a qualified trustee of the qualified trust, or in the absence
of any successor qualified trustee provided for in the qualified trust, then a court of
this Commonwealth shall, upon application of any interested party, appoint a successor
qualified trustee.
SECTION 34. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A qualified trust shall not be deemed revocable on account of its inclusion of one (1) or
Page 21 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
more of the following:
(1) A transferor's power to veto a distribution from the trust;
(2) A power of appointment, other than a power to appoint to the transferor, the
transferor's creditors, the transferor's estate, or the creditors of the transferor's
estate, either exercisable by written instrument of the transferor during the
transferor's life or exercisable by will or other written instrument of the
transferor effective upon the transferor's death;
(3) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of income, including rights to the
income retained in the trust;
(4) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of income or principal from a
charitable remainder unitrust or charitable remainder annuity trust as those
terms are defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 664 or any successor provision;
(5) The transferor's receipt each year of an amount specified in the trust, the amount
not to exceed five percent (5%) of the initial value of the trust or its value
determined from time to time pursuant to the trust;
(6) The transferor's potential or actual receipt or use of principal if the potential or
actual receipt or use of principal would be the result of a qualified trustee's or
qualified trustees' acting:
(a) In the qualified trustee's or trustees' discretion. For purposes of this
subsection, a qualified trustee is presumed to have discretion with respect to
the distribution of principal unless the discretion is expressly denied to the
trustee by the terms of the trust;
(b) Pursuant to a standard that governs the distribution of principal and does
not confer upon the transferor a power to consume, invade, or appropriate
property for the benefit of the transferor, unless the power of the transferor
is limited by an ascertainable standard relating to the health, education,
support, or maintenance within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec. 2041(b)(1)(A)
Page 22 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
or 2514(c)(1), as amended; or
(c) At the direction of an advisor described in Section 31 of this Act who is
acting:
1. In the advisor's discretion; or
2. Pursuant to a standard that governs the distribution of principal and
does not confer upon the transferor a power to consume, invade, or
appropriate property for the benefit of the transferor, unless the power
of the transferor is limited by an ascertainable standard relating to the
health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of 26
U.S.C. sec. 2041(b)(1)(A) or 2514(c)(1), as amended;
(7) The transferor's right to remove a trustee or advisor and to appoint a new trustee
or advisor; provided, however, that the right shall not include the appointment of
a person who is a related or subordinate party with respect to the transferor
within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec. 672(c) or any successor provision;
(8) The transferor's potential or actual use of real property held under a qualified
personal residence trust within the meaning of the term as described in 26 U.S.C.
sec. 2702(c) or any successor provision;
(9) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of income or principal to pay, in
whole or in part, income taxes due on income of the trust if the potential or actual
receipt of income or principal is pursuant to a provision in the trust instrument
that expressly permits a distribution to the transferor as reimbursement for such
taxes and if the distribution would be the result of a qualified trustee's or
qualified trustees' acting:
(a) In the qualified trustee's or trustees' discretion or pursuant to a mandatory
direction in the trust instrument; or
(b) At the direction of an advisor described in Section 31 of this Act who is
acting in that advisor's discretion;
Page 23 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(10) The ability, whether pursuant to direction in the qualified trust or discretion of a
qualified trustee to pay, after the death of the transferor, all or any part of the
debts of the transferor outstanding at the time of the transferor's death, the
expenses of administering the transferor's estate, or any estate or inheritance tax
imposed on or with respect to the transferor's estate; or
(11) A qualified trustee's or qualified trustees' authority to make distributions to pay
taxes in lieu of or in addition to the power to make a distribution for taxes
pursuant to subsections (3), (6), (9), or (10) of this section by direct payment to
taxing authorities.
SECTION 35. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 25 to 35 of this Act shall apply to qualified dispositions to qualified trusts and
dispositions by transferors who are trustees made on or after the effective date of this
Act.
SECTION 36. SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS
ESTABLISHED, AND A NEW SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS:
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Breach of trust" includes a violation by a trust director or trustee of a duty
imposed on that director or trustee by the terms of the trust, the provisions of
Sections 36 to 52 of this Act, or other law of this Commonwealth pertaining to
trusts;
(2) "Directed trust" means a trust for which the terms of the trust grant a power of
direction;
(3) "Directed trustee" means a trustee that is subject to a trust director's power of
direction;
(4) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
Page 24 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(5) "Power of direction" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act.
(6) "Settlor" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(7) "State" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(8) "Terms of a trust" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(9) "Trust director" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act; and
(10) "Trustee" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act.
SECTION 37. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 36 to 52 of this Act apply to a trust, whenever created, that has its principal
place of administration in this Commonwealth, subject to the following rules:
(1) If the trust was created before the effective date of this Act, Sections 36 to 52 of
this Act apply only to a decision or action occurring on or after the effective date
of this Act; and
(2) If the principal place of administration of the trust is changed to this
Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this Act, Sections 36 to 52 of this
Act apply only to a decision or action occurring on or after the date of the
change.
SECTION 38. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The common law and principles of equity supplement the provisions of Sections 36 to
52 of this Act, except to the extent modified by Sections 36 to 52 of this Act or another
statute of this Commonwealth.
SECTION 39. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "power of appointment" means a power that enables a
person acting in a nonfiduciary capacity to designate a recipient of an ownership
interest in or another power of appointment over trust property.
Page 25 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(2) The provisions of Sections 36 to 52 of this Act shall not apply to a:
(a) Power of appointment;
(b) Power to appoint or remove a trustee or trust director;
(c) Power of a settlor over a trust to the extent the settlor has a power to revoke
the trust;
(d) Power of a beneficiary over a trust to the extent the exercise or nonexercise
of the power affects the beneficial interest of:
1. The beneficiary; or
2. Another beneficiary represented by the beneficiary under KRS
386B.3-010 to 386B.3-050 with respect to the exercise or nonexercise
of the power, or;
(e) Power over a trust if:
1. The terms of the trust provide that the power is held in a nonfiduciary
capacity; and
2. The power must be held in a nonfiduciary capacity to achieve the
settlor's tax objectives under the United States Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended, and regulations issued thereunder, as amended.
(3) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, a power granted to a person to
designate a recipient of an ownership interest in or power of appointment over
trust property which is exercisable while the person is not serving as a trustee is a
power of appointment and not a power of direction.
SECTION 40. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to Section 41 of this Act, the terms of a trust may grant a power of
direction to a trust director.
(2) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise:
(a) A trust director may exercise any further power appropriate to the exercise
Page 26 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
or nonexercise of power of direction granted to the director under
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Trust directors with joint powers shall act by majority decision.
SECTION 41. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A trust director is subject to the same rules as a trustee in a like position and under
similar circumstances in the exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction or further
power under subsection (2)(a) of Section 40 of this Act regarding:
(1) A payback provision in the terms of a trust necessary to comply with the
reimbursement requirements of Medicaid law in Section 1917 of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A), as amended, and regulations issued
thereunder, as amended; and
(2) A charitable interest in the trust, including notice regarding the interest to the
Attorney General.
SECTION 42. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, with respect to a power of direction or
further power under subsection (2)(a) of Section 40 of this Act:
(a) A trust director has the same fiduciary duty and liability in the exercise or
nonexercise of the power:
1. If the power is held individually, as a sole trustee in a like position and
under similar circumstances; or
2. If the power is held jointly with a trustee or another trust director, as a
cotrustee in like position and under similar circumstances; and
(b) The terms of the trust may vary the director's duty or liability to the same
extent the terms of the trust could vary the duty or liability of a trustee in a
like position and under similar circumstances.
Page 27 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(2) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, if a trust director is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law other than the provisions of
Sections 36 to 52 of this Act to provide health care in the ordinary course of the
director's business or practice of a profession, to the extent the director acts in
that capacity, the director shall have no duty or liability under Sections 36 to 52
of this Act.
(3) The terms of a trust may impose a duty or liability on a trust director in addition
to the duties and liabilities under this section.
SECTION 43. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a directed trustee shall take reasonable
action to comply with a trust director's exercise or nonexercise of a power of
direction or further power under subsection (2)(a) of Section 40 of this Act, and
the trustee is not liable for the action.
(2) A directed trustee shall not comply with a trust director's exercise or nonexercise
of a power of direction or further power under Section 40 of this Act to the extent
that by complying, the trustee would engage in willful misconduct.
(3) An exercise of a power of direction under which a trust director may release a
trustee or another trust director from liability for breach of trust is not effective
if:
(a) The breach involved the trustee's or other director's willful misconduct;
(b) The release was induced by improper conduct of the trustee or other
director in procuring the release; or
(c) At the time of the release, the director did not know the material facts
relating to the breach.
(4) A directed trustee that has reasonable doubt about its duty under this section may
petition a court with jurisdiction under Subchapter 2 of KRS Chapter 386B for
Page 28 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
instructions.
(5) The terms of a trust may impose a duty or liability on a directed trustee in
addition to the duties and liabilities under this section.
SECTION 44. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to Section 45 of this Act, a trustee shall provide information to a trust
director to the extent the information is reasonably related to both:
(a) The powers or duties of the trustee; and
(b) The powers or duties of the director.
(2) Subject to Section 45 of this Act, a trust director shall provide information to a
trustee or another trust director to the extent the information is reasonably
related to both:
(a) The powers or duties of the director; and
(b) The powers or duties of the trustee or other director.
(3) A trustee that acts in reliance on information provided by a trust director is not
liable for breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance,
unless by so acting the trust director engages in willful misconduct.
(4) A trust director that acts in reliance on information provided by a trustee or
another trust director is not liable for a breach of trust to the extent the breach
resulted from the reliance, unless by so acting the trust director engages in willful
misconduct.
SECTION 45. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise:
(a) The trustee shall not have a duty to:
1. Monitor a trust director; or
2. Inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or trust director
Page 29 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
concerning an instance in which the trustee might have acted
differently than the director; and
(b) By taking an action described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a trustee
does not assume the duty excluded by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise:
(a) The trust director shall not have a duty to:
1. Monitor a trustee or another trust director; or
2. Inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or another trust
director concerning an instance in which the director might have
acted differently than a trustee or another director; and
(b) By taking an action described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a trust
director does not assume the duty excluded by paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
SECTION 46. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The terms of a trust may relieve a cotrustee from duty and liability with respect to
another cotrustee's exercise or nonexercise of a power of the other cotrustee to the
same extent that in a directed trust a directed trustee is relieved from duty and liability
with respect to a trust director's power under Sections 43, 44, and 45 of this Act.
SECTION 47. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An action against a trust director for breach of trust shall be commenced within
the same limitation period as under KRS 386B.10-050 for an action for breach of
trust against a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.
(2) A report or accounting has the same effect on the limitation period for an action
against a trust director for breach of trust that the report or accounting would
have under KRS 386B.10-050 in an action for breach of trust against a trustee in
Page 30 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
a like position and under similar circumstances.
SECTION 48. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In an action against a trust director for breach of trust, the director may assert the
same defenses a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances could assert
in an action for breach of trust against the trustee.
SECTION 49. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) By accepting appointment as a trust director of a trust subject to the provisions of
Sections 36 to 52 of this Act, the director submits to personal jurisdiction of the
courts of this Commonwealth regarding any matter related to a power or duty of
the director.
(2) This section shall not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a
trust director.
SECTION 50. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, the rules applicable to a trustee apply to a
trust director regarding the following matters:
(1) Acceptance under KRS 386B.7-010;
(2) Giving of bond to secure performance under KRS 386B.7-020;
(3) Reasonable compensation under KRS 386B.7.080;
(4) Resignation under KRS 386B.7-050;
(5) Removal under KRS 386B.7-060; and
(6) Vacancy and appointment of successor under KRS 386B.7-040.
SECTION 51. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 36 to 52 of this Act, consideration shall be given
Page 31 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among
states that enact it.
SECTION 52. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The provisions of Sections 36 to 52 of this Act modify, limit, or supersede the
Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et
seq., but do not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001(c) or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003(b).
SECTION 53. SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS
ESTABLISHED, AND A NEW SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS:
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Appointive property" means the property or property interest subject to a power
of appointment;
(2) "Ascertainable standard" means the same as in Section 82 of this Act;
(3) "Authorized fiduciary" means:
(a) A trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that has discretion to
distribute or direct a trustee to distribute part or all of the principal of the
first trust to one (1) or more current beneficiaries;
(b) A special fiduciary appointed under Section 60 of this Act; or
(c) A special needs fiduciary under Section 64 of this Act;
(4) "Beneficiary" means a person that:
(a) Has a present or future, vested or contingent, beneficial interest in a trust;
(b) Holds a power of appointment over trust property; or
(c) Is an identified charitable organization that will or may receive distributions
under the terms of the trust;
(5) "Charitable interest" means an interest in a trust which:
Page 32 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(a) Is held by an identified charitable organization and makes the organization
a qualified beneficiary;
(b) Benefits only charitable organizations and, if the interest were held by an
identified charitable organization, would make the organization a qualified
beneficiary; or
(c) Is held solely for charitable purposes and, if the interest were held by an
identified charitable organization, would make the organization a qualified
beneficiary;
(6) "Charitable organization" means:
(a) A person, other than an individual, organized and operated exclusively for
charitable purposes; or
(b) A government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, to
the extent it holds funds exclusively for a charitable purpose;
(7) "Charitable purpose" means the relief of poverty, the advancement of education
or religion, the promotion of health, a municipal or other governmental purpose,
or another purpose the achievement of which is beneficial to the community;
(8) "Court" means a court in this Commonwealth having jurisdiction in matters
relating to trusts under Subchapter 2 of this chapter;
(9) "Current beneficiary":
(a) Means a beneficiary that on the date of the beneficiary's qualification is
determined is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or
principal; and
(b) Includes the holder of a presently exercisable general power of appointment
but does not include a person that is a beneficiary only because the person
holds any other power of appointment;
(10) "Decanting power" or "the decanting power" means the power of an authorized
fiduciary under Sections 36 to 52 of this Act to distribute property of a first trust
Page 33 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
to one (1) or more second trusts or to modify the terms of the first trust;
(11) "Expanded distributive discretion" means a discretionary power of distribution
that is not limited to an ascertainable standard or a reasonably definite standard;
(12) "First trust" means a trust over which an authorized fiduciary may exercise the
decanting power;
(13) "First-trust instrument" means the trust instrument for a first trust;
(14) "General power of appointment" means a power of appointment exercisable in
favor of a powerholder, the powerholder's estate, a creditor of the powerholder,
or a creditor of the powerholder's estate;
(15) "Jurisdiction" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(16) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(17) "Power of appointment":
(a) Means a power that enables a powerholder acting in a nonfiduciary
capacity to designate a recipient of an ownership interest in or another
power of appointment over the appointive property; and
(b) Does not include a power of attorney;
(18) "Powerholder" means a person in which a donor creates a power of
appointment;
(19) "Presently exercisable power of appointment" means a power of appointment
exercisable by the powerholder at the relevant time and:
(a) Includes a power of appointment exercisable only after the occurrence of a
specified event, the satisfaction of an ascertainable standard, or the passage
of a specified time only after:
1. The occurrence of the specified event;
2. The satisfaction of the ascertainable standard; or
3. The passage of the specified time; and
(b) Does not include a power exercisable only at the powerholder's death;
Page 34 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(20) "Qualified beneficiary" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(21) "Reasonably definite standard" means a clearly measurable standard under
which a holder of a power of distribution is legally accountable within the
meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec. 674(b)(5)(A), as amended, and any applicable
regulations;
(22) "Record" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(23) "Second-trust instrument" means the trust instrument for a second trust;
(24) "Settlor," except as otherwise provided in Section 76 of this Act, has the same
meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(25) "Sign" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(26) "State" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act;
(27) "Terms of the trust" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act; and
(28) "Trust instrument" has the same meaning as in Section 82 of this Act.
SECTION 54. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act shall apply to an express trust that is
irrevocable or revocable by the settlor only with the consent of the trustee or a
person holding an adverse interest.
(2) Sections 53 to 80 of this Act shall not apply to a trust held solely for charitable
purposes.
(3) Subject to Section 66 of this Act, a trust instrument may restrict or prohibit
exercise of the decanting power.
(4) Sections 53 to 80 of this Act do not limit the power of a trustee, powerholder, or
other person to distribute or appoint property in further trust or to modify a trust
under the trust instrument, statutes of this Commonwealth other than the
provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act, common law, a court order, or a
Page 35 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
nonjudicial settlement agreement.
(5) Sections 53 to 80 of this Act do not affect the ability of a settlor to provide in a
trust instrument for the distribution of the trust property or appointment in
further trust of the trust property or for modification of the trust instrument.
SECTION 55. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In exercising the decanting power, an authorized fiduciary shall act in
accordance with its fiduciary duties, including the duty to act in accordance with
the purposes of the first trust.
(2) Sections 53 to 80 of this Act do not create or imply a duty to exercise the
decanting power or to inform the beneficiaries about the applicability of Sections
53 to 80 of this Act.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in a first-trust instrument, for purposes of Sections
36 to 52 of this Act and KRS 386B.8-010 and 386B.8-020, the terms of the first
trust are deemed to include the decanting power.
SECTION 56. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 53 to 80 of this Act shall apply to a trust created before, on, or after the
effective date of this Act which:
(1) Has its principal place of administration in this Commonwealth, including a trust
whose principal place of administration has been changed to this
Commonwealth; or
(2) Provides by its trust instrument that it is governed by the law of this
Commonwealth or is governed by the law of this Commonwealth for the purpose
of:
(a) Administration, including administration of a trust whose governing law for
purposes of administration has been changed to the law of this
Page 36 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
Commonwealth;
(b) Construction of the terms of the trust; or
(c) Determining the meaning or effect of terms of the trust.
SECTION 57. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A trustee or other person that reasonably relies on the validity of a distribution of part
or all of the property of a trust to another trust, or a modification of a trust, under
Sections 53 to 80 of this Act, statutes of this Commonwealth other than Sections 53 to
80 of this Act, or the law of another jurisdiction is not liable to any person for any
action or failure to act as a result of the reliance.
SECTION 58. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A notice period in this section begins on the day notice is given under subsection
(3) of this section and ends fifty-nine (59) days after the day notice is given.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 53 to 80 of this Act, an authorized
fiduciary may exercise the decanting power without the consent of any person
and without court approval.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, an authorized
fiduciary shall give notice in a record of the intended exercise of the decanting
power not less than sixty (60) days before the exercise to:
(a) Each settlor of the first trust, if living or then in existence;
(b) Each qualified beneficiary of the first trust;
(c) Each holder of a presently exercisable power of appointment over any part
or all of the first trust;
(d) Each person that currently has the right to remove or replace the authorized
fiduciary;
(e) Each other fiduciary of the first trust;
Page 37 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(f) Each fiduciary of the second trust; and
(g) The Attorney General, if subsection (2) of Section 65 of this Act applies.
(4) An authorized fiduciary is not required to give notice under subsection (3) of this
section to a person that is not known to the fiduciary or is known to the fiduciary
but cannot be located by the fiduciary after reasonable diligence.
(5) A notice under subsection (3) of this section shall:
(a) Specify the manner in which the authorized fiduciary intends to exercise the
decanting power;
(b) Specify the proposed effective date for exercise of the power;
(c) Include a copy of the first-trust instrument; or
(d) Include a copy of all second-trust instruments.
(6) The decanting power may be exercised before the expiration of the notice period
under subsection (1) of this section if all persons entitled to receive notice waive
the period in a signed record.
(7) The receipt of notice, waiver of the notice period, or expiration of the notice
period does not affect the right of a person to file an application under Section 60
of this Act asserting that:
(a) An attempted exercise of the decanting power is ineffective because it did
not comply with the provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act or was an
abuse of discretion or breach of fiduciary duty; or
(b) Section 73 of this Act applies to the exercise of the decanting power.
(8) An exercise of the decanting power is not ineffective because of the failure to give
notice to one (1) or more persons under subsection (3) of this section if the
authorized fiduciary acted with reasonable care to comply with subsection (3) of
this section.
SECTION 59. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 38 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(1) Notice to a person with authority to represent and bind another person under a
first-trust instrument or the provisions of this chapter has the same effect as
notice given directly to the person represented.
(2) Consent of or waiver by a person with authority to represent and bind another
person under a first-trust instrument or the provisions of this chapter is binding
on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the
representation before the consent or waiver otherwise would become effective.
(3) A person with authority to represent and bind another person under a first-trust
instrument or the provisions of this chapter may file an application under Section
60 of this Act on behalf of the person represented.
(4) A settlor may not bind or represent a beneficiary under Sections 53 to 80 of this
Act.
SECTION 60. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) On application of an authorized fiduciary, a person entitled to notice under
subsection (3) of Section 58 of this Act, a beneficiary, or with respect to a
charitable interest, the Attorney General or other person that has standing to
enforce the charitable interest, the court may:
(a) Provide instructions to the authorized fiduciary regarding whether a
proposed exercise of the decanting power is permitted under Sections 53 to
80 of this Act and consistent with the fiduciary duties of the authorized
fiduciary;
(b) Appoint a special fiduciary and authorize the special fiduciary to determine
whether the decanting power should be exercised under Sections 53 to 80 of
this Act and to exercise the decanting power;
(c) Approve an exercise of the decanting power;
(d) Determine that a proposed or attempted exercise of the decanting power is
Page 39 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
ineffective because:
1. After applying Section 73 of this Act, the proposed or attempted
exercise does not or did not comply with the provisions of Sections 53
to 80 of this Act; or
2. The proposed or attempted exercise would be or was an abuse of
fiduciary's discretion or a breach of fiduciary duty;
(e) Determine the extent to which Section 73 of this Act applies to a prior
exercise of the decanting power;
(f) Provide instructions to the trustee regarding the application of Section 73 of
this Act to a prior exercise of the decanting power; or
(g) Order other relief to carry out the purposes of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act.
(2) On application of an authorized fiduciary, the court may approve:
(a) An increase in the fiduciary's compensation under Section 67 of this Act; or
(b) A modification under Section 69 of this Act of a provision granting a person
the right to remove or replace the fiduciary.
SECTION 61. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
An exercise of the decanting power shall be made in a record signed by an authorized
fiduciary. The signed record shall, directly or by reference to the notice required by
Section 58 of this Act, identify the first trust and the second trust or trusts and state the
property of the first trust being distributed to each second trust and the property, if any,
that remains in the first trust.
SECTION 62. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Noncontingent right" means a right that is not subject to the exercise of
discretion or the occurrence of a specified event that is not certain to occur.
Page 40 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
The term does not include a right held by a beneficiary if any person has
discretion to distribute property subject to the right to any person other than
the beneficiary or the beneficiary's estate;
(b) "Presumptive remainder beneficiary" means a qualified beneficiary other
than a current beneficiary;
(c) "Successor beneficiary" means a beneficiary that is not a qualified
beneficiary on the date the beneficiary's qualification is determined. The
term does not include a person that is a beneficiary only because the person
holds a nongeneral power of appointment; and
(d) "Vested interest" means:
1. A right to a mandatory distribution that is a noncontingent right as of
the date of the exercise of the decanting power;
2. A current and noncontingent right, annually or more frequently, to a
mandatory distribution of income, a specified dollar amount, or a
percentage of value of some or all of the trust property;
3. A current and noncontingent right, annually or more frequently, to
withdraw income, a specified dollar amount, or a percentage of value
of some or all of the trust property;
4. A presently exercisable general power of appointment; or
5. A right to receive an ascertainable part of the trust property on the
trust's termination which is not subject to the exercise of discretion or
to the occurrence of a specified event that is not certain to occur.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and Section 65 of this Act, an authorized
fiduciary that has expanded distributive discretion over the principal of a first
trust for the benefit of one (1) or more current beneficiaries may exercise the
decanting power over the principal of the first trust.
(3) Subject to Section 64 of this Act, in an exercise of the decanting power under this
Page 41 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
section, a second trust shall not:
(a) Include as a current beneficiary a person that is not a current beneficiary of
the first trust, except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Include as a presumptive remainder beneficiary or successor beneficiary a
person that is not a current beneficiary, presumptive remainder beneficiary,
or successor beneficiary of the first trust, except as otherwise provided in
subsection (4) of this section; or
(c) Reduce or eliminate a vested interest.
(4) Subject to subsection (3)(c) of this section and Section 65 of this Act, in an
exercise of the decanting power under this section, a second trust may be a trust
created or administered under the law of any jurisdiction and may:
(a) Retain a power of appointment granted in the first trust;
(b) Omit a power of appointment granted in the first trust, other than a
presently exercisable general power of appointment;
(c) Create or modify a power of appointment if the powerholder is a current
beneficiary of the first trust and the authorized fiduciary has expanded
distributive discretion to distribute principal to the beneficiary; and
(d) Create or modify a power of appointment if the powerholder is a
presumptive remainder beneficiary or successor beneficiary of the first
trust, but the exercise of the power may take effect only after the
powerholder becomes, or would have become if then living, a current
beneficiary.
(5) A power of appointment described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of subsection (4) of
this section may be general or nongeneral. The class of permissible appointees in
favor of which the power may be exercised may be broader than or different from
the beneficiaries of the first trust.
(6) If an authorized fiduciary has expanded distributive discretion over part but not
Page 42 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
all of the principal of a first trust, the fiduciary may exercise the decanting power
under this section over that part of the principal over which the authorized
fiduciary has expanded distributive discretion.
SECTION 63. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "limited distributive discretion" means a discretionary
power of distribution that is limited to an ascertainable standard or a reasonably
definite standard.
(2) An authorized fiduciary that has limited distributive discretion over the principal
of the first trust for the benefit of one (1) or more current beneficiaries may
exercise the decanting power over the principal of the first trust.
(3) Under this section and subject to Section 65 of this Act, a second trust may be
created or administered under the law of any jurisdiction. Under this section, the
second trusts, in the aggregate, shall grant each beneficiary of the first trust
beneficial interests which are substantially similar to the beneficial interests of
the beneficiary of the first trust.
(4) A power to make a distribution under a second trust for the benefit of a
beneficiary who is an individual substantially similar to a power under the first
trust to make a distribution directly to the beneficiary. A distribution is for the
benefit of a beneficiary if:
(a) The distribution is applied for the benefit of the beneficiary;
(b) The beneficiary is under a legal disability or the trustee reasonably believes
the beneficiary is incapacitated, and the distribution is made as permitted
under this chapter; or
(c) The distribution is made as permitted under the terms of the first-trust
instrument and the second-trust instrument for the benefit of the
beneficiary.
Page 43 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(5) If an authorized fiduciary has limited distributive discretion over part but not all
of the principal of a first trust, the fiduciary may exercise the decanting power
under this section over that part of the principal over which the authorized
fiduciary has limited distributive discretion.
SECTION 64. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Beneficiary with a disability" means a beneficiary of a first trust who the
special needs fiduciary believes may qualify for governmental benefits based
on disability, whether or not the beneficiary currently receives those benefits
or is an in individual who has been adjudicated incompetent;
(b) "Governmental benefits" means financial aid or services from a state,
federal, or other public agency;
(c) "Special needs fiduciary" means, with respect to a trust that has a
beneficiary with a disability:
1. A trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that has discretion to
distribute part or all of the principal of a first trust to one (1) or more
current beneficiaries;
2. If no trustee or fiduciary has discretion under subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, a trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that has
discretion to distribute part or all of the income of the first trust to one
(1) or more current beneficiaries; or
3. If no trustee or beneficiary has discretion under subparagraphs 1. and
2. of this paragraph, a trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor,
that is required to distribute part or all of the income or principal of
the first trust to one (1) or more current beneficiaries; and
(d) "Special needs trust" means a trust that the trustee believes would not be
Page 44 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
considered a resource for purposes of determining whether a beneficiary
with a disability is eligible for governmental benefits.
(2) A special needs fiduciary may exercise the decanting power in Section 62 of this
Act over the principal of the first trust as if the fiduciary had authority to
distribute principal to a beneficiary with a disability subject to expanded
distributive discretion if:
(a) A second trust is a special needs trust that benefits the beneficiary with a
disability; and
(b) The special needs fiduciary determines that exercise of the decanting power
will further the purposes of the first trust.
(3) In an exercise of the decanting power under this section, the following rules
apply:
(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of Section 62 of this Act, the interest in
the second trust of a beneficiary with a disability may:
1. Be a pooled trust as defined by Medicaid law for the benefit of the
beneficiary with a disability under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A), as
amended; or
2. Contain payback provisions complying with reimbursement
requirements of Medicaid law under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A), as
amended;
(b) Subsection (3)(c) of Section 62 of this Act shall not apply to the interests of
the beneficiary with a disability; and
(c) Except as affected by any change to the interests of the beneficiary with a
disability, the second trust, or if there are two (2) or more second trusts, the
second trusts in the aggregate, shall grant each other beneficiary of the first
trust beneficial interests in the second trust which are substantially similar
to the beneficiary's beneficial interests in the first trust.
Page 45 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
SECTION 65. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Determinable charitable interest" means a charitable interest that is a
right to a mandatory distribution currently, periodically, on the occurrence
of a specified event, or after the passage of a specified time and which is
unconditional or will be held solely for charitable purposes; and
(b) "Unconditional" means not subject to the occurrence of a specified event
that is not certain to occur, other than a requirement in a trust instrument
that a charitable organization be in existence or qualify under a particular
provision of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
on the date of the distribution, if the charitable organization meets the
requirement on the date of determination.
(2) If a first trust contains a determinable charitable interest, the Attorney General
has the rights of a qualified beneficiary and may represent and bind the
charitable interest.
(3) If a first trust contains a charitable interest, the second trust or trusts shall not:
(a) Diminish the charitable interest;
(b) Diminish the interest of an identified charitable organization that holds the
charitable interest;
(c) Alter any charitable purpose stated in the first-trust instrument; or
(d) Alter any condition or restriction related to the charitable interest.
(4) If there are two (2) or more second trusts, the second trusts shall be treated as one
(1) trust for purposes of determining whether the exercise of the decanting power
diminishes the charitable interest or diminishes the interest of an identified
charitable organization for purposes of subsection (3) of this section.
(5) If a first trust contains a determinable charitable interest, the second trust or
Page 46 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
trusts that include a charitable interest pursuant to subsection (3) of this section
shall be administered under the law of this Commonwealth unless:
(a) The Attorney General, after having received notice under Section 58 of this
Act, fails to object in a signed record delivered to the authorized fiduciary
within the notice period;
(b) The Attorney General consents in a signed record to the second trust or
trusts being administered under the law of another jurisdiction; or
(c) The court approves the exercise of the decanting power.
(6) Sections 53 to 80 of this Act do not limit the powers and duties of the Attorney
General under the law of this Commonwealth other than the provisions of
Sections 53 to 80 of this Act.
SECTION 66. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An authorized fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to the extent the
first-trust instrument expressly prohibits the exercise of:
(a) The decanting power; or
(b) A power granted by state law to the fiduciary to distribute part or all of the
principal of the trust to another trust or to modify the trust.
(2) Exercise of the decanting power is subject to any restriction in the first-trust
instrument that expressly applies to the exercise of:
(a) The decanting power; or
(b) A power granted by state law to a fiduciary to distribute part or all of the
principal of the trust to another trust or to modify the trust.
(3) A general prohibition of the amendment or revocation of a first trust, a
spendthrift clause, or a clause restraining the voluntary or involuntary transfer of
a beneficiary's interest does not preclude exercise of the decanting power.
(4) Subject to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an authorized fiduciary may
Page 47 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
exercise the decanting power under Sections 53 to 80 of this Act even if the first-
trust instrument permits the authorized fiduciary or another person to modify the
first-trust instrument or to distribute part or all of the principal of the first trust to
another trust.
(5) If a first-trust instrument contains an express prohibition described in subsection
(1) of this section or an express restriction described in subsection (2) of this
section, the provision shall be included in the second-trust instrument.
SECTION 67. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a first-trust instrument specifies an authorized fiduciary's compensation, the
fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to increase the fiduciary's
compensation above the specified compensation unless:
(a) All qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to the increase in a
signed record; or
(b) The increase is approved by the court.
(2) If a first-trust instrument does not specify an authorized fiduciary's
compensation, the fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to increase the
fiduciary's compensation above the compensation permitted by this chapter
unless:
(a) All qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to the increase in a
signed record; or
(b) The increase is approved by the court.
(3) A change in an authorized fiduciary's compensation which is incidental to other
changes made by the exercise of the decanting power is not an increase in the
fiduciary's compensation for purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
SECTION 68. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 48 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a second-trust instrument may not
relieve an authorized fiduciary from liability for breach of trust to a greater
extent than the first-trust instrument.
(2) A second-trust instrument may provide for indemnification of an authorized
fiduciary of the first trust or another person acting in a fiduciary capacity under
the first trust for any liability or claim that would have been payable from the first
trust if the decanting power had not been exercised.
(3) A second-trust instrument may not reduce fiduciary liability in the aggregate.
(4) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a second-trust instrument may divide and
reallocate fiduciary powers among the fiduciaries, including one (1) or more
trustees, distribution advisors, investment advisors, trust protectors, or other
persons, and relieve a fiduciary from liability for an act or failure to act of
another fiduciary as permitted by law of this Commonwealth other than Sections
53 to 80 of this Act.
SECTION 69. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
An authorized fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to modify a provision in
a first-trust instrument granting another person power to remove or replace the
fiduciary unless:
(1) The person holding the power consents to the modification in a signed record and
the modification applies only to that person;
(2) The person holding the power and the qualified beneficiaries of the second trust
consent to the modification in a signed record and the modification grants a
substantially similar power to another person; or
(3) The court approves the modification and the modification grants a substantially
similar power to another person.
SECTION 70. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
Page 49 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Grantor trust" means a trust as to which a settlor of a first trust is
considered the owner under 26 U.S.C. secs. 671 to 677, as amended, or 26
U.S.C. sec. 679, as amended;
(b) "Internal Revenue Code" means the United States Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended;
(c) "Nongrantor trust" means a trust that is not a grantor trust; and
(d) "Qualified benefits property" means property subject to the minimum
distribution requirements of 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(a)(9), as amended, and any
applicable regulations, or to any similar requirements that refer to 26
U.S.C. sec. 401(a)(9) or the regulations.
(2) An exercise of the decanting power is subject to the following limitations:
(a) If a first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but
for provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act other than this section, for a
marital deduction for purposes of the gift or estate tax under the Internal
Revenue Code or a state gift, estate, or inheritance tax, the second-trust
instrument shall not include or omit any term that, if included in or omitted
from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property was
transferred, would have prevented the transfer from qualifying for the
deduction, or would have reduced the amount of the deduction, under the
same provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or state law under which the
transfer qualified;
(b) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but
for provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act other than this section, for a
charitable deduction for purposes of the income, gift, or estate tax under the
Internal Revenue Code or a state income, gift, estate, or inheritance tax, the
Page 50 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
second-trust instrument shall not include or omit any term that, if included
from or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property
was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from qualifying for the
deduction, or would have reduced the amount of the deduction, under the
same provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or state law under which the
transfer qualified;
(c) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but
for provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act other than this section, for the
exclusion from the gift tax described in:
1. 26 U.S.C. sec. 2503(b), as amended, the second-trust instrument shall
not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the trust
instrument for the trust to which the property was transferred, would
have prevented the transfer from qualifying under 26 U.S.C. sec.
2503(b), as amended; or
2. 26 U.S.C. sec. 2503(c), as amended, the second-trust instrument shall
not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the trust
instrument for the trust to which the property was transferred, would
have prevented the transfer from qualifying under 26 U.S.C. sec.
2503(c), as amended;
(d) If the property of the first trust includes shares of stock in an S corporation
as defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 1361, as amended, and the first trust is, but for
provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act other than this section would be, a
permitted shareholder under any provision of 26 U.S.C. sec. 1361, as
amended, an authorized fiduciary may exercise the power with respect to
part of all the S-corporation stock only if any second trust receiving the
stock is a permitted shareholder under 26 U.S.C. sec. 1361(c)(2), as
amended. If the property of the first trust includes shares of stock in an S
Page 51 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
corporation and the first trust is, or but for provisions of Sections 53 to 80
of this Act other than this section would be, a qualified subchapter-S trust
within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec. 1361(d), as amended, the second-trust
instrument shall not include or omit a term that prevents the second trust
from qualifying as a qualified subchapter-S trust;
(e) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but
for provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act other than this section, for a
zero inclusion ratio for purposes of the generation-skipping transfer tax
under 26 U.S.C. sec. 2642(c), as amended, the second-trust instrument shall
not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the first-trust
instrument, would have prevented the transfer to the first trust from
qualifying for a zero inclusion ratio under 26 U.S.C. sec. 2642(c), as
amended;
(f) If the first trust is directly or indirectly the beneficiary of qualified benefits
property, the second-trust instrument shall not include or omit any term
that, if included in or omitted from the first-trust instrument, would have
increased the minimum distributions required with respect to the qualified
benefits property under 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(a)(9), as amended, and any
applicable regulations, or any similar requirements that refer to 26 U.S.C.
sec. 401(a)(9), as amended, or the regulations. If an attempted exercise of
the decanting power violates the preceding sentence, the trustee is deemed to
have held the qualified benefits property and any reinvested distributions of
the property as a separate share from the date of the exercise of the power,
and Section 73 of this Act applies to the separate share;
(g) If the first trust qualifies as a grantor trust because of the application of 26
U.S.C. sec. 672(f)(2)(A), as amended, the second trust shall not include or
omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the first-trust instrument,
Page 52 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
would have prevented the first trust from qualifying under 26 U.S.C. sec.
672(f)(2)(A), as amended;
(h) As used in this paragraph, "tax benefit" means a federal or state tax
deduction, exemption, exclusion, or other benefit not otherwise listed in this
section, except for a benefit arising from being a grantor trust. Subject to
paragraph (i) of this subsection, a second-trust instrument shall not include
or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the first-trust instrument,
would have prevented qualification for a tax benefit if:
1. The first-trust instrument expressly indicates an intent to qualify for
the benefit or the first-trust instrument clearly is designed to enable
the first trust to qualify for the benefit; and
2. The transfer of property held by the first trust or the first trust
qualified, or but for the provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act
other than this section, would have qualified for the tax benefit;
(i) Subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection:
1. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (g) of this subsection, the
second trust may be a nongrantor trust, even if the first trust is a
grantor trust; and
2. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (j) of this subsection, the
second trust may be a grantor trust, even if the first trust is a
nongrantor trust; and
(j) An authorized fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power if a settlor
objects in a signed record delivered to the fiduciary within the notice period
and:
1. The first trust and a second trust are both grantor trusts, in whole or
in part, the first trust grants the settlor or another person the power to
cause the first trust to cease to be a grantor trust, and the second trust
Page 53 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
does not grant an equivalent power to the settlor or other person; or
2. The first trust is a nongrantor trust and a second trust is a grantor
trust, in whole or in part, with respect to the settlor, unless:
a. The settlor has the power at all times to cause the second trust to
cease to be a grantor trust; or
b. The first-trust instrument contains a provision granting the
settlor or another person a power that would cause the first trust
to cease to be a grantor trust and the second-trust instrument
contains the same provision.
SECTION 71. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a second trust may have a duration that
is the same as or different from the duration of the first trust.
(2) To the extent that property of a second trust is attributable to property of the first
trust, the property of the second trust is subject to any rules governing maximum
perpetuity, accumulation, or suspension of the power of alienation which apply to
the property of the first trust.
SECTION 72. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
An authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power whether or not under the
first trust's discretionary distribution standard the fiduciary would have made or could
have been compelled to make a discretionary distribution of principal at the time of the
exercise.
SECTION 73. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If exercise of the decanting power would be effective under Sections 53 to 80 of
this Act except that the second-trust instrument in part does not comply with the
Page 54 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act, the exercise of the power is effective
and the following rules shall apply with respect to the principal of the second
trust attributable to the exercise of the power:
(a) A provision in the second-trust instrument which is not permitted under
Sections 53 to 80 of this Act is void to the extent necessary to comply with
Sections 53 to 80 of this Act; and
(b) A provision required by Sections 53 to 80 of this Act to be in the second-
trust instrument which is not contained in the instrument is deemed to be
included in the instrument to the extent necessary to comply with Sections
53 to 80 of this Act.
(2) If a trustee or other fiduciary of a second trust determines that subsection (1) of
this section applies to a prior exercise of the decanting power, the fiduciary shall
take corrective action consistent with the fiduciary's duties.
SECTION 74. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Animal trust" means a trust or an interest in a trust created to provide for
the care of one (1) or more animals; and
(b) "Protector" means a person appointed in an animal trust to enforce the
trust on behalf of the animal or, if no such person is appointed in the trust,
a person appointed by the court for that purpose.
(2) The decanting power may be exercised over an animal trust that has a protector
to the extent the trust could be decanted under Sections 53 to 80 of this Act if
each animal that benefits from the trust were an individual, if the protector
consents in a signed record to the exercise of the power.
(3) A protector for an animal has the rights under Sections 53 to 80 of this Act of a
qualified beneficiary.
Page 55 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act, if a first
trust is an animal trust, in an exercise of the decanting power, the second trust
shall provide that trust property may be applied only to its intended purpose for
the period the first trust benefitted the animal.
SECTION 75. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A reference in KRS Chapter 386B to a trust instrument or terms of the trust includes a
second-trust instrument and the terms of the second trust.
SECTION 76. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of law of this Commonwealth other than Sections 53 to 80 of this
Act and subject to subsection (2) of this section, a settlor of a first trust is deemed
to be the settlor of the second trust with respect to the portion of the principal of
the first trust subject to the exercise of the decanting power.
(2) In determining settlor intent with respect to a second trust, the intent of a settlor
of the first trust, a settlor of the second trust, and the authorized fiduciary may be
considered.
SECTION 77. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if exercise of the
decanting power was intended to distribute all the principal of the first trust to
one (1) or more second trusts, later-discovered property belonging to the first
trust and property paid to or acquired by the first trust after the exercise of the
power is part of the trust estate of the second trust or trusts.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if exercise of the
decanting power was intended to distribute less than all the principal of the first
trust to one (1) or more second trusts, later-discovered property belonging to the
Page 56 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
first trust or property paid to or acquired by the first trust after exercise of the
power remains part of the trust estate of the first trust.
(3) An authorized fiduciary may provide in an exercise of the decanting power or by
the terms of a second trust for disposition of later-discovered property belonging
to the first trust or property paid to or acquired by the first trust after exercise of
the power.
SECTION 78. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A debt, liability, or other obligation enforceable against property of a first trust is
enforceable to the same extent against the property when held by the second trust after
exercise of the decanting power.
SECTION 79. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 53 to 80 of this Act, consideration shall be given
to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among
states that enact it.
SECTION 80. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER
386B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The provisions of Sections 53 to 80 of this Act modify, limit, or supersede the
Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et
seq., but do not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that Act, 15 U.S.C. sec.
7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section
103(b) of that Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003(b).
Section 81. KRS 386.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 386.010 to 386.170[386.175], unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Fiduciary" means any trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, conservator or
other individual or corporation holding funds or otherwise acting in a fiduciary
Page 57 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
capacity.
(2) "Principal" means any person to whom a fiduciary, as such, owes an obligation.
Section 82. KRS 386B.1-010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Action" with respect to an act of a trustee, includes a failure to act;
(2) "Ascertainable standard" means a standard relating to an individual's health,
education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec.
2041(b)(1)(A) or 26 U.S.C. sec. 2514(c)(1), as amended;
(3) "Beneficiary" means a person that:
(a) Has a present or future beneficial interest in a trust, vested or contingent; or
(b) In a capacity other than that of trustee, holds a power of appointment over
trust property;
(4) "Charitable trust" means a trust, or part of a trust, established for a charitable
purpose as described in KRS 386B.4-050(1);
(5) "Conservator" means a person appointed by the court to administer the estate of a
minor or adult individual;
(6) "Environmental law" means a federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or
ordinance relating to protection of the environment;
(7) "Guardian" means a person appointed by the court, a parent, or a spouse to make
decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, and welfare of a minor or
adult individual. The term shall not include a guardian ad litem;
(8) "Interests of the beneficiaries" means the beneficial interests provided in the terms
of the trust;
(9) "Jurisdiction," with respect to a geographic area, includes a state or country;
(10) "Person" means any individual or entity as defined in KRS 446.010;
(11) "Power of direction":
(a) Means a power over a trust granted to a person by the terms of the trust to
Page 58 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
the extent the power is exercisable while the person is not serving as a
trustee;
(b) Includes a power over the investment, management, or distribution of trust
property or other matters of trust administration; and
(c) Excludes the powers described in subsection (2) of Section 39 of this Act;
(12)[(11)] "Power of withdrawal" means a presently exercisable general power of
appointment other than a power:
(a) Exercisable by a trustee and limited by an ascertainable standard; or
(b) Exercisable by another person only on the consent of the trustee or a person
holding an adverse interest;
(13)[(12)] "Property" means anything that may be the subject of ownership, whether
legal or equitable, or any interest therein;
(14)[(13)] "Qualified beneficiary" means a beneficiary who, on the date the beneficiary's
qualification is determined:
(a) Is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;
(b) Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal
if the interests of the distributees described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
ended on that date without causing the trust to end; or
(c) Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal
if the trust ended on that date;
(15)[(14)] "Revocable," as applied to a trust, means revocable by the settlor without the
consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest;
(16)[(15)] "Settlor" means a person, including a testator, who creates or contributes
property to a trust. If more than one (1) person creates or contributes property to a
trust, each person is a settlor of the part of the trust property attributable to that
person's contribution except to the extent another person has the power to revoke or
withdraw that part;
Page 59 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(17)[(16)] "Spendthrift provision" means a term of a trust which restrains both voluntary
and involuntary transfer of a beneficiary's interest;
(18)[(17)] "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto
Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject
to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band
recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state;
(19)[(18)] "Terms of a trust" means:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
manifestation of the settlor's intent regarding a trust's provisions as:
1. Expressed in the trust instrument; or[ as may be ]
2. Established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial
proceeding; or
(b) The trust's provisions as established, determined, or amended by:
1. A trustee or trust director in accordance with applicable law;
2. A court order; or
3. A nonjudicial settlement agreement under KRS 386B.1-090;
(20)[(19)] (a) "Trust" means an express trust established by a trust instrument,
including a will, whereby a trustee has the duty to administer a trust asset for
the benefit of a named or otherwise described income or principal beneficiary,
or both. This definition includes oral trusts.
(b) "Trust" does not include a resulting or constructive trust, a business trust
which provides for certificates to be issued to the beneficiary, an investment
trust, a voting trust, a security instrument, a trust established by the judgment
of a court, a liquidation trust, or a trust for the primary purpose of paying
dividends, interests, interest coupons, salaries, wages, pensions or profits, or
employee benefits of any kind, an instrument in which a person is nominee or
escrowee for another, a trust established in deposits in any financial
Page 60 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
institution, or other trust the nature of which does not admit of general trust
administration;
(21) "Trust director" means a person that is granted power of direction by the terms
of a trust to the extent the power is exercisable while the person is not serving as
a trustee. The person is a trust director whether or not the terms of the trust refer
to the person as a trust director and whether or not the person is a beneficiary or
settlor of the trust;
(22)[(20)] "Trust instrument" means an instrument signed by the settlor that contains
terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto; and
(23)[(21)] "Trustee" includes an original, additional, and successor trustee, and a
cotrustee.
Section 83. KRS 386B.1-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, this chapter governs the
duties and powers of a trustee, relations among trustees, and the rights and interests
of a beneficiary.
(2) The terms of a trust prevail over any provision of this chapter, except:
(a) The requirements for creating a trust;
(b) Subject to Sections 43, 45, and 46 of this Act, the duty of a trustee to act in
good faith and in the interests of the beneficiaries;
(c) The requirement that a trust and its terms be for the benefit of its
beneficiaries, and that the trust have a purpose that is lawful, not contrary to
public policy, and possible to achieve;
(d) The power of the court to change or terminate a trust under Subchapter 4 of
this chapter;
(e) The effect of a spendthrift provision and the rights of certain creditors and
assignees to reach a trust as provided in Subchapter 5 of this chapter;
(f) The power of the court under KRS 386B.7-020 to require, dispense with, or
Page 61 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
modify or terminate a bond;
(g) The power of the court under KRS 386B.7-080(2) to adjust a trustee's
compensation as specified in the terms of the trust which is unreasonably low
or high;
(h) The duty to notify and report under KRS 386B.8-130(2);
(i) The effect of an exculpatory term under KRS 386B.10-080;
(j) The rights under KRS 386B.10-100, 386B.10-110, and 386B.10-120 of a
person other than a trustee or beneficiary;
(k) Periods of limitation for commencing a judicial proceeding;
(l) The power of the court to take such action and exercise such jurisdiction as
may be necessary in the interests of justice; and
(m) The subject-matter jurisdiction of the court and venue for commencing a
proceeding as provided in KRS 386B.2-030 and 386B.2-040.
Section 84. KRS 386B.1-060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Without precluding other means for establishing a connection with the designated
jurisdiction, terms of a trust designating the principal place of administration are
valid and controlling if:
(a) A trustee's principal place of business is located in or a trustee is a resident of
the designated jurisdiction;[ or]
(b) A trust director's principal place of business is located in or a trust director
is a resident of the designated jurisdiction; or
(c)[(b)] All or part of the administration occurs in the designated jurisdiction.
(2) A trustee is under a continuing duty to administer the trust at a place appropriate to
its purposes, its administration, and the interests of the beneficiaries.
(3) Without precluding the right of the court to order, approve, or disapprove a transfer,
the trustee, in furtherance of the duty prescribed by subsection (2) of this section,
may transfer the trust's principal place of administration to another state or to a
Page 62 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
jurisdiction outside of the United States.
(4) The trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of a proposed transfer of a trust's
principal place of administration not less than sixty (60) days before initiating the
transfer. The notice of proposed transfer shall include:
(a) The name of the jurisdiction to which the principal place of administration is
to be transferred;
(b) The address and telephone number at the new location at which the trustee
can be contacted;
(c) An explanation of the reasons for the proposed transfer;
(d) The date on which the proposed transfer is anticipated to occur; and
(e) The date, not less than sixty (60) days after the giving of the notice, by which
the qualified beneficiary shall notify the trustee of an objection to the
proposed transfer.
(5) The authority of a trustee under this section to transfer a trust's principal place of
administration ends if a qualified beneficiary notifies the trustee of an objection to
the proposed transfer on or before the date specified in the notice.
(6) In connection with a transfer of the trust's principal place of administration, the
trustee may transfer some or all of the trust property to a successor trustee
designated in the terms of the trust or appointed under KRS 386B.7-040.
(7) The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under this section.
Section 85. KRS 386B.3-010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this
subchapter has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.
(2) The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this
subchapter is binding on the person represented unless the person represented
objects to the representation before the consent would otherwise have become
effective.
Page 63 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
(3) Except as otherwise provided under KRS 386B.4-110 and 386B.6-020, a person
who under this subchapter may represent a settlor who lacks capacity, may receive
notice and give a binding consent on the settlor's behalf.
(4) A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this subchapter with
respect to the termination or modification of a trust under KRS 386B.4-110(1).
(5) Provisions of this subchapter shall also be applicable to Sections 53 to 80 of this
Act[KRS 386.175] regarding a trustee's power to appoint principal and income in
favor of a trustee of a second trust and KRS 386.454 regarding a trustee's power to
adjust between principal and income and conversion to unitrust.
Section 86. KRS 386B.6-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) While a trust is revocable:
(a) And, in the reasonable belief of the trustee, the settlor has capacity to revoke
the trust, rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties
of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor; and
(b) The trustee may follow a direction of the settlor that is contrary to the terms
of the trust.
(2) During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal
has the rights of a settlor of a revocable trust under this section to the extent of the
property subject to the power.
Section 87. KRS 386B.7-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Cotrustees who are unable to reach a unanimous decision may act by majority
decision.
(2) If a vacancy occurs in a cotrusteeship, the remaining cotrustees may act for the
trust.
(3) Subject to Section 46 of this Act, a cotrustee shall participate in the performance of
a trustee's function unless the cotrustee is unavailable to perform the function
because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary
Page 64 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
incapacity or the cotrustee has properly delegated the performance of the function
to another trustee.
(4) If a cotrustee is unavailable to perform duties because of absence, illness,
disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity, and prompt action
is necessary to achieve the purposes of the trust or to avoid injury to the trust
property, the remaining cotrustee or a majority of the remaining cotrustees may act
for the trust.
(5) A trustee may not delegate to a cotrustee the performance of a function the settlor
reasonably expected the trustees to perform jointly. Unless a delegation was
irrevocable, a trustee may revoke a delegation previously made.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, a trustee who does
not join in an action of another trustee is not liable for the action.
(7) Subject to Section 46 of this Act, each trustee shall exercise reasonable care to:
(a) Prevent a cotrustee from committing a breach of trust; and
(b) Compel a cotrustee to redress a breach of trust.
(8) A dissenting trustee who joins in an action at the direction of the majority of the
trustees and who notified any cotrustee of the dissent at or before the time of the
action is not liable for the action unless the action is a breach of trust.
Section 88. KRS 394.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, "will":
(1) Means a last will or testament, codicil, appointment by will, writing in the nature of
a will in exercise of a power, and any other testamentary disposition; and
(2) Includes a codicil and any testamentary instrument that merely appoints an
executor, revokes or revises another will, nominates a guardian, or expressly
excludes or limits the right of an individual or class to succeed to property of the
decedent passing by intestate succession.
Section 89. The following KRS sections are repealed:
Page 65 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 987
386B.8-080 Powers to direct.
386.175 Trustee's power to appoint principal or income in favor of trustee of second
trust -- Terms of second trust -- Special fiduciary -- Notice -- Judicial
proceedings.
Section 90. Sections 1 to 9 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Electronic
Wills Act.
Section 91. Sections 10 to 24 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Electronic
Estate Planning Documents Act.
Section 92. Sections 25 to 35 of this Act may be cited as the Kentucky
Qualified Dispositions in Trust Act.
Section 93. Sections 36 to 52 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Directed
Trust Act.
Section 94. Sections 53 to 80 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Trust
Decanting Act.
Page 66 of 66
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:22 AM Jacketed